California, session 20252026, AB1887.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1342.76 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1342.76. (a) (1) A health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall require a health care service plan to complete prior authorization or other utilization review within 30 days upon initial request for a prescription drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is approved for the treatment of a rare disease if the drug is prescribed by a specialist with expertise in the condition or disease being treated and the specialist has determined the drug is medically necessary, unless a biosimilar, interchangeable biologic, or generic version of the drug is available. necessary.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), an initial request occurs when a health care provider or the health care provider’s staff sends a prior authorization request or utilization review request to the health care service plan or health care service plan’s delegate. (3) Prior authorization or other utilization review for a drug prescribed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be immediately approved under either of the following conditions:(A) A decision approving or denying prior authorization or other utilization review has not been made by the end of the 30-day period.(B) A dispute between the plan and provider or enrollee regarding the prior authorization or other utilization review is ongoing at the end of the 30-day period.(b)Notwithstanding any other law, a health care service plan contract issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall not impose step therapy for a drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is approved for the treatment of a rare disease if the drug is prescribed by a specialist with expertise in the condition or disease being treated and the specialist has determined the drug is medically necessary, unless a biosimilar, interchangeable biologic, or generic version of the drug is available. (c)(b) For purposes of this section, “rare disease” means a disease that affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States.(d)(c) This section does not affect the timelines described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 1367.01. (e)(d) This section does not apply to Medi-Cal managed care contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services entered into pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of, or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of, Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.SEC. 2. Section 10123.1936 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.1936. (a) (1) A health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall require a health insurer to complete prior authorization or other utilization review within 30 days upon initial request for a prescription drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is approved for the treatment of a rare disease if the drug is prescribed by a specialist with expertise in the condition or disease being treated and the specialist has determined the drug is medically necessary, unless a biosimilar, interchangeable biologic, or generic version of the drug is available. necessary.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), an initial request occurs when a health care provider or the health care provider’s staff sends a prior authorization request or utilization review request to the health insurer or health insurer’s delegate.(3) Prior authorization or other utilization review for a drug prescribed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be immediately approved under either of the following conditions:(A) A decision approving or denying prior authorization or other utilization review has not been made by the end of the 30-day period.(B) A dispute between the insurer and provider or insured regarding the prior authorization or other utilization review is ongoing at the end of the 30-day period.(b)Notwithstanding any other law, a health insurance policy issued, amended, or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, shall not impose step therapy for a drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration that is approved for the treatment of a rare disease if the drug is prescribed by a specialist with expertise in the condition or disease being treated and the specialist has determined the drug is medically necessary, unless a biosimilar, interchangeable biologic, or generic version of the drug is available. (c)(b) For purposes of this section, “rare disease” means a disease that affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States.(d)(c) This section does not affect the timelines described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 10123.135.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.